Washington statutes.
RCW 6.26.040

Action against plaintiff for wrongful garnishment—Damages and attorney's fees.

In all actions in which a prejudgment writ of garnishment has been issued by a court and served upon a garnishee, in the event judgment is not entered for the plaintiff on the claim sued upon by plaintiff, and the claim has not voluntarily been settled or otherwise satisfied, the defendant shall have an action for damages against the plaintiff. The defendant's action for damages may be brought by way of a counterclaim in the original action or in a separate action and, in the action the trier of fact, in addition to other actual damages sustained by the defendant, may award the defendant reasonable attorney's fees.

[ 1987 c 442 s 904; 1970 ex.s. c 61 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 34. Formerly RCW 7.33.340.]